Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6311.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32. (a) Claims for benefits shall must be made pursuant to in accordance with regulations prescribed by the unemployment insurance agency. The unemployment insurance agency shall designate representatives who shall promptly examine claims and make a determination on the facts. The unemployment insurance agency may establish rules providing for the examination of claims, the determination of the validity of the claims, and the amount and duration of benefits to be paid. The Not later than 14 days after the determination is made, the claimant and other interested parties shall must be promptly notified of the determination and the of all of the following information: (i) The reasons for the determination. (ii) The facts on which the representative relied in making the determination. (iii) The section number of this act on which the representative based the determination. (iv) The deadline for a protest or appeal of the determination and how to file a protest or appeal. (b) The Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the unemployment insurance agency shall mail to the claimant, to each base period employer or employing unit, and to the separating employer or employing unit, a monetary determination. The unemployment insurance agency may electronically deliver the monetary determination if the claimant consents to that delivery method or has submitted an application or other document through the unemployment insurance agency's electronic portal or system. If the electronic delivery fails or is rejected, the unemployment insurance agency must promptly mail the monetary determination. If the monetary determination is delivered electronically, it is considered to have been received by the claimant on 1 of the following dates: (i) The date that the unemployment insurance agency electronically delivered the monetary determination. (ii) If the electronic delivery failed or was rejected, the date that the unemployment insurance agency mailed the monetary determination. (c) The monetary determination shall must notify each of these the employers or employing units described in subsection (b) that the claimant has filed an application for benefits and the amount the claimant reported as earned with the separating employer or employing unit, and shall must state the name of each employer or employing unit in the base period and the name of the separating employer or employing unit. The monetary determination shall must also state the all of the following: (i) The claimant's weekly benefit rate, the amount of base period wages paid by each base period employer, the maximum benefit amount that could be charged to each employer's account or experience account, and the reason for separation reported by the claimant. The monetary determination shall also state whether (ii) Whether the claimant is monetarily eligible to receive unemployment benefits. (iii) The reasons for the monetary determination. (iv) The facts on which the representative relied in making the monetary determination. (v) The section number of this act on which the representative based the monetary determination. (vi) The deadline for a protest or appeal of the monetary determination and how to file a protest or appeal. (d) Except for separations under section 29(1)(a), no further reconsideration of a separation from any base period employer will be made unless the base period employer notifies the unemployment insurance agency of a possible disqualifying separation within not later than 30 days of after the separation in accordance with this subsection. Charges to the employer and payments to the claimant shall must be as described in section 20(a). New, additional, or corrected information received by the unemployment insurance agency more than 10 days after mailing the monetary determination shall under subsection (b) must be considered a request for reconsideration by the employer of the monetary determination and shall be reviewed as provided in under section 32a. (e) (c) For the purpose of determining a claimant's nonmonetary eligibility and qualification for benefits, if the claimant's most recent base period or benefit year separation was for a reason other than the lack of work, then a determination shall must be issued concerning that separation to the claimant and to the separating employer. If a claimant is not disqualified based on his or her the claimant's most recent separation from employment and has satisfied the requirements of section 29, the unemployment insurance agency shall issue a nonmonetary determination as to that separation only. If a claimant is not disqualified based on his or her the claimant's most recent separation from employment and has not satisfied the requirements of section 29, the unemployment insurance agency shall issue 1 or more nonmonetary determinations necessary to establish the claimant's qualification for benefits based on any prior separation in inverse chronological order. The unemployment insurance agency shall consider all base period separations involving disqualifications under section 29(1)(h), (i), (j), (k), (m), or (n) in determining a claimant's nonmonetary eligibility and qualification for benefits. An employer may designate in writing to the unemployment insurance agency an individual or another employer or an employing unit to receive any notice required to be given by the unemployment insurance agency to that employer or to represent that employer in any proceeding before the unemployment insurance agency as provided in under section 31. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, beginning May 1, 2020, and until the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, in determining a claimant's nonmonetary eligibility to qualify for benefits, the unemployment agency shall not issue a determination with respect to the claimant's separation from a base period or benefit year employer other than the separating employer, and the unemployment agency shall consider the claimant to have satisfied the requirements of section 29(2) and (3). (f) (d) If the unemployment insurance agency requests additional monetary or nonmonetary information from an employer or employing unit and the unemployment insurance agency fails to does not receive a written response from the employer or employing unit within 10 calendar days or sooner after the date of mailing the request for information, the unemployment insurance agency shall make a determination based upon on the available information at the time the determination is made. Charges to the employer and payments to the claimant shall be are as described in section 20(a). (g) (e) The claimant or interested party may file an application with an office of the unemployment insurance agency for a redetermination in accordance with section 32a. (h) (f) The issuance of each benefit check shall be is considered a determination by the unemployment insurance agency that the claimant receiving the check was covered during the compensable period , and eligible and qualified for benefits. A chargeable employer, upon on receipt of a listing of the check as provided in under section 21(a), may protest by requesting a redetermination of the claimant's eligibility or qualification as to that period and a determination as to later weeks and benefits still unpaid that are affected by the protest. Upon On receipt of the protest or request, the unemployment insurance agency shall investigate and redetermine whether the claimant is eligible and qualified as to that period. If, upon on the redetermination, the claimant is found ineligible or not qualified, the unemployment insurance agency shall proceed as described in section 62. In addition, the unemployment insurance agency shall investigate and determine whether the claimant obtained benefits for 1 or more preceding weeks within the series of consecutive weeks that includes the week covered by the redetermination and, if so, shall proceed as described in section 62 as to those weeks. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, for benefits charged after March 15, 2020 but before April 1, 2021, an employer has 1 year after the date a benefit payment is charged against the employer's account to protest that charge. (i) (g) If a claimant commences to file continued claims through a different state claim office in this state or elsewhere, the unemployment insurance agency promptly shall issue written notice of that fact to the chargeable employer not later than 14 days after the claimant commences to file. (j) (h) If a claimant refuses an offer of work, or fails to apply for work of which the claimant has been notified, as provided in under section 29(1)(c) or (e), the unemployment insurance agency shall promptly make a written determination as to whether or not the refusal or failure requires disqualification under section 29. Notice of the determination, specifying the name and address of the employing unit offering or giving notice of the work and of the chargeable employer, shall must be sent to the claimant, the employing unit offering or giving notice of the work, and the chargeable employer. (k) (i) The unemployment insurance agency shall issue a notification to the claimant of claimant rights and responsibilities within not later than 2 weeks after the initial benefit payment on a claim and 6 months after the initial benefit payment on the claim. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (l), the unemployment insurance agency shall mail the notification to the claimant. The unemployment insurance agency may electronically deliver the notification if the claimant consents to that delivery method or has submitted an application or other document through the unemployment insurance agency's electronic portal or system. If the electronic delivery fails or is rejected, the unemployment insurance agency must promptly mail the notification. If the notification is delivered electronically, it is considered to have been received by the claimant on 1 of the following dates: (i) The date that the unemployment insurance agency electronically delivered the notification. (ii) If the electronic delivery failed or was rejected, the date that the unemployment insurance agency mailed the notification. (l) If the claimant selected a preferred form of communication, the notification required under subsection (k) must be conveyed delivered by that form. Issuing the notification must not delay or interfere with the claimant's benefit payment. The notification must contain clear and understandable information pertaining to all of the following: (i) Determinations as provided in section 62. (ii) Penalties and other sanctions as provided in this act. (iii) Legal right to protest the determination and the right to appeal through the administrative hearing system. (iv) Other information needed to understand and comply with agency rules and regulations not specified in this section.